Connecticut, session 2026, SB00359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions
2 of section 12-62 of the general statutes or any municipal charter, special
3 act or home rule ordinance, the city of Hartford, which is required to
4 implement a revaluation of real property for the assessment year
5 commencing October 1, 2026, pursuant to section 12-62 of the general
6 statutes, may defer such implementation until the assessment year
7 commencing October 1, 2027, provided such deferral is approved by the
8 legislative body of such city. The rate maker, as defined in section 12-
9 131 of the general statutes, may prepare new rate bills under the
10 provisions of chapter 204 of the general statutes to carry out the
11 provisions of this section.
12 (b) Any required revaluation subsequent to any deferred revaluation
13 implemented pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
sSB359 / File No. 294 1

sSB359 File No. 294
14 implemented in accordance with the provisions of section 12-62 of the
15 general statutes. Such subsequent revaluation shall recommence at the
16 point in the schedule required pursuant to section 12-62 of the general
17 statutes that such city was following prior to such deferral.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a), "such municipality" was changed to "such city" for
consistency, and in Subsec. (b), "the city" was changed to "such city" for
clarity.
PD Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB359 / File No. 294 2

sSB359 File No. 294
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Hartford Grand List See Below See Below
Impact
Explanation
The bill allows Hartford to delay an October 1, 2026 revaluation by
one year. This shifts any costs associated with revaluation and any
subsequent grand list changes into the future, provided the municipal
legislative body approves the delay.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB359 / File No. 294 3

sSB359 File No. 294
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 359
AN ACT AUTHORIZING THE DEFERRAL OF A PROPERTY
REVALUATION.